Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2250
Herd, defined.

Herd shall mean (1) any group of livestock maintained on common ground for any purpose or (2) two or more groups of livestock under common ownership or supervision geographically separated but which have an interchange of livestock without regard to whether the livestock are infected or exposed.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 54-2218;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 15.